Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1708
Recognizance; signature; certificate.

All recognizances taken during vacation of any court, by any judge or other officer thereof authorized to take them, shall be signed by the parties and certified to by the officer taking the same.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 433, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9077;

C.S.1922, § 10101;

C.S.1929, § 29-1708;

R.S.1943, § 29-1708.